Hawaii statutes.
§486-52 Measurement standard. (a) Any
petroleum product which is in a liquid state under conditions of seven hundred
sixty millimeters of Hg at sixty degrees Fahrenheit shall be measured in terms
of the U.S. petroleum gallon; its multiple or decimal submultiples, or
compatible units of the SI as established by rule of the board.

(b) Any petroleum product which is in a vapor
state under conditions of 258.575 millimeters or less of Hg at sixty degrees
Fahrenheit shall be measured in terms of cubic feet or in terms of a U.S.
petroleum gallon, their multiples or decimal submultiples, or compatible units
of the SI as established by rule of the board.

(c) Any device required to automatically
compensate for temperature shall only apply to metered sales of liquid
petroleum products that have a rated capacity of two hundred gallons per minute
or more; provided that whenever a partial compartment or partial tank truck
load is delivered, it shall be delivered through a meter that meets the
requirements specified in rules adopted by the department. [L 1988, c 156, pt
of §3; am L 1995, c 146, §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next